Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-137
Explosives; storage; fireworks; regulation.

A city of the second class shall have the power to (1) regulate and prevent storage of gunpowder, tar, pitch, resin, coal oil, benzine, turpentine, hemp, cotton, nitroglycerine, petroleum, or any of the productions thereof and other material, (2) regulate the use of lights in stables and shops and other places, (3) regulate the building of bonfires, and (4) regulate, prohibit, and restrain the use of fireworks, firecrackers, Roman candles, sky rockets, and other pyrotechnic displays.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 196;

R.S.1913, § 5031;

C.S.1922, § 4200;

C.S.1929, § 17-139;

R.S.1943, § 17-137;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 29.